dev/ortho/cyr-ara.twol
Alphabet 

 !ء
 ئ ا ە ب پ ت ج چ خ د ر ز ژ س ش غ ف ق ك گ ڭ ل م ن ھ و ۇ ۆ ۋ ې ى ي  ٸ ٶ ٷ ٵ 
 
 !% ء

 ! ء ا ە ه ې ب ت پ ج چ خ ح د ر ز ژ س ش ع ف ق ك گ ڭ ل م ن ھ و ۇ ۋ ى ي ۆ

 А:ا
 Ә:ا
 Б:ب
 В:ۋ
 Г:گ
 Ғ:ع
 Д:د
 Е:ە
 Ё:يو
 Ж:ج
 З:ز
 И:ي
 І:ى
 Й:ي
 К:ك
 Қ:ق
 Л:ل
 М:م
 Н:ن
 Ң:ڭ
 О:و
 Ө:ۆ
 П:پ
 Р:ر
 С:س
 Т:ت
 У:ۋ
 Ұ:ۇ
 Ү:ۇ
 Ф:ف
 Х:خ
 Һ:ه
 Ц:تس
 Ч:چ
 Ш:ش
 Щ:شش
 Ь:0
 Ы:ى
 Ъ:0
 Э:ە
 Ю:يۋ
 Я:يا
 а:ا
 ә:ا
 б:ب
 в:ۋ
 г:گ
 ғ:ع
 д:د
 е:ە
 ё:يو
 ж:ج
 з:ز
 и:ي
 і:ى
 й:ي
 к:ك
 қ:ق
 л:ل
 м:م
 н:ن
 ң:ڭ
 о:و
 ө:و
 п:پ
 р:ر
 с:س
 т:ت
 у:ۋ
 ұ:ۇ
 ү:ۇ
 ф:ف
 х:خ
 һ:ه
 ц:تس
 ч:چ
 ш:ش
 щ:شش
 ь:0
 ы:ى
 ъ:0
 э:ە
 ю:يۋ
 я:يا
! % :% ء
! % :◌
! ء:ٴ
 ء:0
 %,:%،
 %;:%؛

 %{ء%}:0
 %{й%}:0

 ;


Sets 

Vow = а е ;

letter = ء ئ ا ە ب پ ت ج چ خ د ر ز ژ س ش غ ف ق ك گ ڭ ل م ن ھ و ۇ ۆ ۋ ې ى ي ;

backCons = қ ғ
           Қ Ғ ;

backVow = а о ы ұ у
          А О Ы Ұ У ;

Cons = б в г ғ д ж з й к қ л м н ң п р с т ф х һ ц ч ш щ 
       Б В Г Ғ Д Ж З Й К Қ Л М Н Ң П Р С Т Ф Х Һ Ц Ч Ш Щ ;

frontVowCyrNoE = і ү ө ә
                 І Ү Ө Ә ;

frontConsCyr = к г
               К Г ;

frontLetter = ك گ ە ;

Rules 

!"ь -> 0" 
!ь:0 <=> _ ;
!
!"0 -> ء"
!0:ء <=> .#. _ ;

! ٵ ٶ ٷ ٸ

!"ء -> 0"
!ء:0 <=> _ :letter* [ :گ | :ك | :ە ];
!        _ [ backCons: | backVow: ] ;
!        _ Cons:* backVow: ;

"retain dayekshe"
! when front vowel but no front stuff follows"
!%{ء%}:ٴ <=> _ \:frontLetter frontVowCyrNoE: \:frontLetter* %  ;
%{ء%}:ء <=> _ \:frontLetter frontVowCyrNoE: \:frontLetter* %  ;
            _ \:frontLetter \:frontLetter* .#. ;

!"make dayekshe-modified vowel letters"
!Vx:Vy <=> ء:0 _ ;
!      where
!          VX in ( і ү ө ә )
!          Vy in ( ٸ ٷ ٶ ٵ )
!      matched ;

"ө+dayekshe"
ө:ٶ <=> ء:0 _ \:frontLetter* %  ;

"ө+dayekshe"
ү:ٷ <=> ء:0 _ \:frontLetter* %  ;

"ө+dayekshe"
ә:ٵ <=> ء:0 _ \:frontLetter* %  ;

"ө+dayekshe"
і:ٸ <=> ء:0 _ \:frontLetter* %  ;

"don't double ي"
и:0 <=> _ [ я: | ю: | е: | ё: ] ;

"%{й%}:ي after vowels"
%{й%}:0 <=> Vow: _ ;
